Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4609
Rules of classification.

(a) In this section, adverse party means a person with a substantial beneficial interest in property which would be affected adversely by a powerholder's exercise or nonexercise of a power of appointment in favor of the powerholder, the powerholder's estate, a creditor of the powerholder, or a creditor of the powerholder's estate.

(b) If a powerholder may exercise a power of appointment only with the consent or joinder of an adverse party, the power is nongeneral.

(c) If the permissible appointees of a power of appointment are not defined and limited, the power is exclusionary.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 32.